Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 3

Cattle Guards

65-6-301. Cattle guards on unfenced track.

Each railroad company whose unfenced track passes through a field or enclosure is required to place a good and sufficient cattle guard or stops at the points of entering such field or enclosure, and keep the same in good repair.

Acts 1889, ch. 248, § 1; Shan., § 1595; Code 1932, § 2662; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-645.

Law Reviews.

Easements in Tennessee, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 619 (1956).

65-6-302. Enlargement of unfenced area.

In case a field or enclosure through which unfenced railroad track passes shall be enlarged or extended, or the owner of the land over which such unfenced track passes shall open a field so as to embrace the track of such railroad, such railroad company is required to place good and sufficient cattle guards or stops at the margin of such enclosure or fields, and keep the same in repair; provided, that such owner shall give the nearest or most accessible agent of such company thirty (30) days' notice of such change.

Acts 1889, ch. 248, § 2; Shan., § 1596; Code 1932, § 2663; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-646.

65-6-303. Penalty for noncompliance.

Any railroad company neglecting or refusing to comply with this part shall be liable for all damages sustained by anyone by reason of such neglect or refusal; and, in order for the injured party to recover all damages such person sustained, it shall be only necessary for such person to prove such neglect or refusal, and the amount of such damages; provided, that such company shall not be liable if it shall be shown that the opening of such field was made capriciously and with intent to annoy and molest such company.

Acts 1889, ch. 248, § 3; Shan., § 1597; Code 1932, § 2664; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-647.